District of Columbia statutes.
16-1104

Proof necessary.

(a)

Except as provided by subsection (b) of this section, in an action of ejectment it is sufficient to entitle the plaintiff to relief to show that he is entitled, as against the defendant, to the immediate possession of the premises claimed, and that the defendant is:

(1)

in possession of the premises, and is holding adversely to the plaintiff; or

(2)

exercising acts of ownership over the premises, adversely to the plaintiff.

(b)

In an action pursuant to this chapter by one or more joint tenants or tenants in common against their cotenants, the plaintiff shall be required to prove an actual ouster or some other act amounting to a denial of the plaintiff’s title and his exclusion from the enjoyment of the property.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 565, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1981 Ed., § 16-1104.
1973 Ed., § 16-1104.